Arkansas, session 2025, SB592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 32, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-32-211. Certificates of deposit — Renewal at highest interest rate.
If a financial institution does not have instructions from a
certificate holder concerning a renewal of a certificate of deposit, the
financial institution shall renew the certificate of deposit:
(1) At the highest fixed interest rate that is closest to the
fixed interest rate of the term or period of time of the previous certificate
of deposit; and
(2) For the same term or period of time as the previous
certificate of deposit.
*ANS351*
03/31/2025 4:13:38 PM ANS351